Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2840.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; MINITEX.new text end new text begin $8,155,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $8,208,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education for Minitex to serve Minnesota academic and state government libraries by expanding their conventional and virtual access to local, state, regional, national, and international information resources. new text end